Utah statutes.
73-16-1.   Ratification.

The Bear River Compact entered into at Salt Lake City, Utah, on February 4, 1955, by Idaho, Utah and Wyoming, by the representatives of those states, with the approval of the representative of the United States of America, is hereby unconditionally ratified, approved and confirmed for and by the state of Utah.



Enacted by Chapter 161, 1955 General Session

